Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-109
Ceremony; requirements.

In the solemnization of marriage no particular form shall be required, except that the parties shall solemnly declare in the presence of the magistrate or minister and the attending witnesses, that they take each other as husband and wife; and in any case there shall be at least two witnesses, besides the minister or magistrate present at the ceremony.

R.S.1866, c. 34, § 9, p. 255;

R.S.1913, § 1548;

C.S.1922, § 1497;

C.S.1929, § 42-109;

R.S.1943, § 42-109.

Presence of clergyman or magistrate is not indispensable. Gibson v. Gibson, 24 Neb. 394, 39 N.W. 450 (1888).